District of Columbia statutes.
50-2503

Establishment and purposes of the Public Parking Authority of the District of Columbia.

(a)

There is established an Authority to be known as the Public Parking Authority of the District of Columbia (“Authority”).

(b)

The Authority shall be organized as a corporate body which has a legal existence separate from the District government but which is an instrumentality of the District government created to effectuate the following purposes:

(1)

Identifying and assessing the public parking needs of the District; and

(2)

Providing public parking facilities to serve specific geographical areas in the District and services relating to the management of those facilities, parking feasibility assessment, facility design criteria, financing, construction management and oversight, and facility management and maintenance within specific geographic areas.

History

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 4, 41 DCR 4652

Cross References

Nominees and candidates for public office, disclosure of conflicts of interest, see § 1-1106.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2508 and § 50-2509.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-843.